New Jersey, session 222, S1082.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in conjunction with the Division of Travel and Tourism in the Department of State, shall develop and implement a Jersey Craft Beverage Retailer Promotion and Grant Program to encourage, advertise, and promote craft alcohol beverages manufactured in the State and those State retailers who promote and sell craft alcohol beverages within the State of New Jersey. b.    The Jersey Craft Beverage Retailer Promotion and Grant Program shall: (1)   increase consumer awareness of the New Jersey craft alcohol beverages made by the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, farm brewery license, cidery and meadery license, or craft distillery license; (2)   increase consumer awareness of State holders of a plenary retail consumption license, seasonal retail consumption license, or plenary retail distribution license, that regularly promote and sell products manufactured by the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, farm brewery license, cidery and meadery license, or craft distillery license; (3)   organize advertising campaigns and create marketing programs that promote craft alcohol beverages manufactured in the State and those State retailers who promote and sell New Jersey craft alcohol beverages in the State; (4)   disseminate information about the variety and availability of craft alcohol beverages produced in the State; and (5)   create a Certified Jersey Craft Alcohol Beverage Retailer signage program to be used by the holder of a plenary retail consumption license, seasonal retail consumption license, or plenary retail distribution license where at least 10 percent of the annual sales revenue is derived from alcohol beverage sales from products manufactured by the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, farm brewery license, cidery and meadery license, or craft distillery license. c.     (1) The New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall establish a Certified Jersey Craft Alcohol Beverage Retailer Grant Program. The program shall provide grants to the holders of a plenary retail consumption license, seasonal retail consumption license, or plenary retail distribution license, that are qualified as a Certified Jersey Craft Alcohol Beverage Retailer pursuant to subsection b. of this section, to provide support for the increased retail sale of craft alcohol beverages produced in the State.  The maximum award to a grantee under the program shall not exceed $2,500 annually. (2)   In establishing the grant program, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall: (a)   develop guidelines, procedures, and timelines for application submissions by holders of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, farm brewery license, cidery and meadery license, or craft distillery license for the grant program and approvals thereof, as well as for the reporting measures associated with grant activities; (b)   establish criteria for holders of a plenary retail consumption license, seasonal retail consumption license, or plenary retail distribution license, that are qualified as a Certified Jersey Craft Alcohol Beverage Retailer to qualify for a grant from the program; and (c)   designate acceptable uses for the grants, including, but not limited to capital improvements or the purchase of goods and services that support the promotion and sales of New Jersey craft alcohol beverages, and funding for the purchase, installation, construction, repair or reconditioning of equipment and facilities on a licensed premises utilized to serve, refrigerate, store or display New Jersey craft alcohol beverages. d.    The New Jersey Economic Development Authority shall establish a "New Jersey Certified Jersey Craft Alcohol Beverage Retailer Fund."  All monies in the fund shall be expended by the authority for issuing grants pursuant to subsection c. of this section.   The fund shall be credited annually, in an appropriation by law, with an amount equal to 50 percent of revenues derived from the tax, pursuant to R.S.54:43-1, on all sales of beer, cider, mead, and liquors sold by the holder of a limited brewery license, restricted brewery license, farm brewery license, cidery and meadery license, or craft distillery license during the preceding taxable year.  The fund shall also be credited with any monies made available from the General Fund or any non-State public or private source.  The authority shall include with the annual budget request for the authority a request for funds sufficient to carry out the purposes of this act. e.     The New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the Division of Travel and Tourism, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.